test/src/gt-norm-yamls/myv-tests-noun_gt-norm.yaml
    псака+N+Sg+Abe+Def+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Abe+Def+Clt/Гак: псакавтомонтьсевтементькак
    псака+N+Sg+Abe+Def+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Comp+Def+Clt/Гак: псакавтомонтьсешкантькак
    псака+N+Sg+Abe+Def+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Tra+Def+Clt/Гак: псакавтомонтьсексэнтькак
    псака+N+Sg+Abe+Def+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Nom+Def+Clt/Гак: псакавтомонтьсетнеяк
    псака+N+Sg+Abe+Def+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Gen+Def+Clt/Гак: псакавтомонтьсетненьгак
    псака+N+Sg+Abe+Def+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+DatCx+Def+Clt/Гак: псакавтомонтьсетнененьгак
    псака+N+Sg+Abe+Def+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Abl+Def+Clt/Гак: псакавтомонтьсетнедеяк
    псака+N+Sg+Abe+Def+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ine+Def+Clt/Гак: псакавтомонтьсетнесэяк
    псака+N+Sg+Abe+Def+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ela+Def+Clt/Гак: псакавтомонтьсетнестэяк
    псака+N+Sg+Abe+Def+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ill+Def+Clt/Гак: псакавтомонтьсетнескак
    псака+N+Sg+Abe+Def+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Prl+Def+Clt/Гак: псакавтомонтьсетневаяк
    псака+N+Sg+Abe+Def+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Tra+Def+Clt/Гак: псакавтомонтьсетнекскак
    псака+N+Sg+Abe+Def+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Lat+Def+Clt/Гак: псакавтомонтьсетневгак
    псака+N+Sg+Abe+Def+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Abe+Def+Clt/Гак: псакавтомонтьсетневтемеяк
    псака+N+Sg+Abe+Def+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Comp+Def+Clt/Гак: псакавтомонтьсетнешкаяк
    псака+N+Sg+Abe+Def+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Com+Def+Clt/Гак: псакавтомонтьсетненеккак
    псака+N+Sg+Comp+Def+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Abl+Indef+Clt/Гак: псакашкантьседеяк
    псака+N+Sg+Comp+Def+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Tra+Indef+Clt/Гак: псакашкантьсекскак
    псака+N+Sg+Comp+Def+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Nom+Def+Clt/Гак: псакашкантьсеськак
    псака+N+Sg+Comp+Def+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Gen+Def+Clt/Гак: псакашкантьсентькак
    псака+N+Sg+Comp+Def+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+DatCx+Def+Clt/Гак: псакашкантьсентеньгак
    псака+N+Sg+Comp+Def+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Abl+Def+Clt/Гак: псакашкантьседентькак
    псака+N+Sg+Comp+Def+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ine+Def+Clt/Гак: псакашкантьсесэнтькак
    псака+N+Sg+Comp+Def+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ela+Def+Clt/Гак: псакашкантьсестэнтькак
    псака+N+Sg+Comp+Def+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Prl+Def+Clt/Гак: псакашкантьсевантькак
    псака+N+Sg+Comp+Def+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Abe+Def+Clt/Гак: псакашкантьсевтементькак
    псака+N+Sg+Comp+Def+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Comp+Def+Clt/Гак: псакашкантьсешкантькак
    псака+N+Sg+Comp+Def+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Tra+Def+Clt/Гак: псакашкантьсексэнтькак
    псака+N+Sg+Comp+Def+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Nom+Def+Clt/Гак: псакашкантьсетнеяк
    псака+N+Sg+Comp+Def+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Gen+Def+Clt/Гак: псакашкантьсетненьгак
    псака+N+Sg+Comp+Def+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+DatCx+Def+Clt/Гак: псакашкантьсетнененьгак
    псака+N+Sg+Comp+Def+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Abl+Def+Clt/Гак: псакашкантьсетнедеяк
    псака+N+Sg+Comp+Def+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ine+Def+Clt/Гак: псакашкантьсетнесэяк
    псака+N+Sg+Comp+Def+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ela+Def+Clt/Гак: псакашкантьсетнестэяк
    псака+N+Sg+Comp+Def+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ill+Def+Clt/Гак: псакашкантьсетнескак
    псака+N+Sg+Comp+Def+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Prl+Def+Clt/Гак: псакашкантьсетневаяк
    псака+N+Sg+Comp+Def+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Tra+Def+Clt/Гак: псакашкантьсетнекскак
    псака+N+Sg+Comp+Def+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Lat+Def+Clt/Гак: псакашкантьсетневгак
    псака+N+Sg+Comp+Def+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Abe+Def+Clt/Гак: псакашкантьсетневтемеяк
    псака+N+Sg+Comp+Def+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Comp+Def+Clt/Гак: псакашкантьсетнешкаяк
    псака+N+Sg+Comp+Def+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Com+Def+Clt/Гак: псакашкантьсетненеккак
